Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1250
Duty to enforce.

(a) A court of this state shall recognize and enforce a child custody determination of a court of another state if the latter court exercised jurisdiction in substantial conformity with the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act or the determination was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of the act and the determination has not been modified in accordance with the act.

(b) A court of this state may utilize any remedy available under other law of this state to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another state. The remedies provided in sections 43-1248 to 43-1264 are cumulative and do not affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody determination.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 25.